Washington statutes.
RCW 7.64.070

Qualification and justification of sureties.

The qualification of sureties and their justification shall be as prescribed by law.

[ 1957 c 51 s 17; Code 1881 s 148; 1877 p 31 s 148; 1869 p 37 s 146; 1854 p 151 s 106; RRS s 713.]

NOTES:

Corporate surety—Insurance: Chapter 48.28 RCW.